Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6301
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-6301 to 44-6306 shall be known and may be cited as the Disclosure of Material Insurance Transactions Act.

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 1.